pl.aff
FLAG long
SFX J1 Y 318
SFX J1   ec        okę       lec
SFX J1   0         zesz      lec
SFX J1   0         ze        lec
SFX J1   0         zemy      lec
SFX J1   0         zecie     lec
SFX J1   ec        oką       lec
SFX J1   c         kę        uc
SFX J1   0         zesz      uc
SFX J1   0         ze        uc
SFX J1   0         zemy      uc
SFX J1   0         zecie     uc
SFX J1   c         ką        uc
SFX J1   ać        ię        [^s]bać
SFX J1   ać        iesz      [^s]bać
SFX J1   ać        ie        [^s]bać
SFX J1   ać        iemy      [^s]bać
SFX J1   ać        iecie     [^s]bać
SFX J1   ać        ią        [^s]bać
SFX J1   zdać      żdżę      zdać
SFX J1   zdać      żdżesz    zdać
SFX J1   zdać      żdże      zdać
SFX J1   zdać      żdżemy    zdać
SFX J1   zdać      żdżecie   zdać
SFX J1   zdać      żdżą      zdać
SFX J1   gać       żę        łgać
SFX J1   gać       żesz      łgać
SFX J1   gać       że        łgać
SFX J1   gać       żemy      łgać
SFX J1   gać       żecie     łgać
SFX J1   gać       żą        łgać
SFX J1   echać     adę       echać
SFX J1   chać      dziesz    echać
SFX J1   chać      dzie      echać
SFX J1   chać      dziemy    echać
SFX J1   chać      dziecie   echać
SFX J1   echać     adą       echać
SFX J1   ać        eję       [il]ać
SFX J1   ać        ejesz     [il]ać
SFX J1   ać        eje       [il]ać
SFX J1   ać        ejemy     [il]ać
SFX J1   ać        ejecie    [il]ać
SFX J1   ać        eją       [il]ać
SFX J1   ać        ę         jać
SFX J1   ać        esz       jać
SFX J1   ać        e         jać
SFX J1   ać        emy       jać
SFX J1   ać        ecie      jać
SFX J1   ać        ą         jać
SFX J1   kać       czę       kać
SFX J1   kać       czesz     kać
SFX J1   kać       cze       kać
SFX J1   kać       czemy     kać
SFX J1   kać       czecie    kać
SFX J1   kać       czą       kać
SFX J1   słać      ścielę    słać
SFX J1   słać      ścielesz  słać
SFX J1   słać      ściele    słać
SFX J1   słać      ścielemy  słać
SFX J1   słać      ścielecie słać
SFX J1   słać      ścielą    słać
SFX J1   ać        ię        mać
SFX J1   ać        iesz      mać
SFX J1   ać        ie        mać
SFX J1   ać        iemy      mać
SFX J1   ać        iecie     mać
SFX J1   ać        ią        mać
SFX J1   ać        ię        ąpać
SFX J1   ać        iesz      ąpać
SFX J1   ać        ie        ąpać
SFX J1   ać        iemy      ąpać
SFX J1   ać        iecie     ąpać
SFX J1   ać        ią        ąpać
SFX J1   spać      śpię      spać
SFX J1   spać      śpisz     spać
SFX J1   spać      śpi       spać
SFX J1   spać      śpimy     spać
SFX J1   spać      śpicie    spać
SFX J1   spać      śpią      spać
SFX J1   ać        zę        [^bp]rać
SFX J1   ać        zesz      [^bp]rać
SFX J1   ać        ze        [^bp]rać
SFX J1   ać        zemy      [^bp]rać
SFX J1   ać        zecie     [^bp]rać
SFX J1   ać        zą        [^bp]rać
SFX J1   rać       iorę      [bp]rać
SFX J1   rać       ierzesz   [bp]rać
SFX J1   rać       ierze     [bp]rać
SFX J1   rać       ierzemy   [bp]rać
SFX J1   rać       ierzecie  [bp]rać
SFX J1   rać       iorą      [bp]rać
SFX J1   ać        zę        [^s]sać
SFX J1   ać        zesz      [^s]sać
SFX J1   ać        ze        [^s]sać
SFX J1   ać        zemy      [^s]sać
SFX J1   ać        zecie     [^s]sać
SFX J1   ać        zą        [^s]sać
SFX J1   ać        ę         ssać
SFX J1   ać        iesz      ssać
SFX J1   ać        ie        ssać
SFX J1   ać        iemy      ssać
SFX J1   ać        iecie     ssać
SFX J1   ać        ą         ssać
SFX J1   osać      eszę      osać
SFX J1   osać      eszesz    osać
SFX J1   osać      esze      osać
SFX J1   osać      eszemy    osać
SFX J1   osać      eszecie   osać
SFX J1   osać      eszą      osać
SFX J1   tać       czę       [ąop]tać
SFX J1   tać       czesz     [ąop]tać
SFX J1   tać       cze       [ąop]tać
SFX J1   tać       czemy     [ąop]tać
SFX J1   tać       czecie    [ąop]tać
SFX J1   tać       czą       [ąop]tać
SFX J1   tać       cę        [op]tać
SFX J1   tać       cesz      [op]tać
SFX J1   tać       ce        [op]tać
SFX J1   tać       cemy      [op]tać
SFX J1   tać       cecie     [op]tać
SFX J1   tać       cą        [op]tać
SFX J1   ać        oję       stać
SFX J1   ać        oisz      stać
SFX J1   ać        oi        stać
SFX J1   ać        oimy      stać
SFX J1   ać        oicie     stać
SFX J1   ać        oją       stać
SFX J1   wać       ję        awać
SFX J1   wać       jesz      awać
SFX J1   wać       je        awać
SFX J1   wać       jemy      awać
SFX J1   wać       jecie     awać
SFX J1   wać       ją        awać
SFX J1   iwać      uję       iwać
SFX J1   iwać      ujesz     iwać
SFX J1   iwać      uje       iwać
SFX J1   iwać      ujemy     iwać
SFX J1   iwać      ujecie    iwać
SFX J1   iwać      ują       iwać
SFX J1   ować      uję       ować
SFX J1   ować      ujesz     ować
SFX J1   ować      uje       ować
SFX J1   ować      ujemy     ować
SFX J1   ować      ujecie    ować
SFX J1   ować      ują       ować
SFX J1   ywać      uję       ywać
SFX J1   ywać      ujesz     ywać
SFX J1   ywać      uje       ywać
SFX J1   ywać      ujemy     ywać
SFX J1   ywać      ujecie    ywać
SFX J1   ywać      ują       ywać
SFX J1   zać       żę        [^cdr]zać
SFX J1   zać       żesz      [^cdr]zać
SFX J1   zać       że        [^cdr]zać
SFX J1   zać       żemy      [^cdr]zać
SFX J1   zać       żecie     [^cdr]zać
SFX J1   zać       żą        [^cdr]zać
SFX J1   ać        eję       rzać
SFX J1   ać        ejesz     rzać
SFX J1   ać        eje       rzać
SFX J1   ać        ejemy     rzać
SFX J1   ać        ejecie    rzać
SFX J1   ać        eją       rzać
SFX J1   ąć        mę        [aey]dąć
SFX J1   ąć        miesz     [aey]dąć
SFX J1   ąć        mie       [aey]dąć
SFX J1   ąć        miemy     [aey]dąć
SFX J1   ąć        miecie    [aey]dąć
SFX J1   ąć        mą        [aey]dąć
SFX J1   dąć       edmę      [^aey]dąć
SFX J1   dąć       edmiesz   [^aey]dąć
SFX J1   dąć       edmie     [^aey]dąć
SFX J1   dąć       edmiemy   [^aey]dąć
SFX J1   dąć       edmiecie  [^aey]dąć
SFX J1   dąć       edmą      [^aey]dąć
SFX J1   ciąć      etnę      ciąć
SFX J1   ciąć      etniesz   ciąć
SFX J1   ciąć      etnie     ciąć
SFX J1   ciąć      etniemy   ciąć
SFX J1   ciąć      etniecie  ciąć
SFX J1   ciąć      etną      ciąć
SFX J1   iąć       nę        giąć
SFX J1   iąć       niesz     giąć
SFX J1   iąć       nie       giąć
SFX J1   iąć       niemy     giąć
SFX J1   iąć       niecie    giąć
SFX J1   iąć       ną        giąć
SFX J1   ąć        nę        ląć
SFX J1   ąć        niesz     ląć
SFX J1   ąć        nie       ląć
SFX J1   ąć        niemy     ląć
SFX J1   ąć        niecie    ląć
SFX J1   ąć        ną        ląć
SFX J1   ąć        ę         snąć
SFX J1   snąć      śniesz    snąć
SFX J1   snąć      śnie      snąć
SFX J1   snąć      śniemy    snąć
SFX J1   snąć      śniecie   snąć
SFX J1   ć         0         snąć
SFX J1   ąć        ę         znąć
SFX J1   ć         0         znąć
SFX J1   znąć      źniesz    znąć
SFX J1   znąć      źnie      znąć
SFX J1   znąć      źniemy    znąć
SFX J1   znąć      źniecie   znąć
SFX J1   żąć       eżnę      żąć
SFX J1   żąć       eżniesz   żąć
SFX J1   żąć       eżnie     żąć
SFX J1   żąć       eżniemy   żąć
SFX J1   żąć       eżniecie  żąć
SFX J1   żąć       eżną      żąć
SFX J1   dzieć     m         dzieć
SFX J1   dzieć     sz        dzieć
SFX J1   dzieć     0         dzieć
SFX J1   dzieć     my        dzieć
SFX J1   dzieć     cie       dzieć
SFX J1   ieć       ą         dzieć
SFX J1   ieć       ę         cieć
SFX J1   eć        sz        cieć
SFX J1   eć        0         cieć
SFX J1   eć        my        cieć
SFX J1   eć        cie       cieć
SFX J1   ieć       ą         cieć
SFX J1   ieć       ę         nieć
SFX J1   ć         sz        nieć
SFX J1   ć         0         nieć
SFX J1   ć         my        nieć
SFX J1   ć         cie       nieć
SFX J1   ieć       ą         nieć
SFX J1   eć        ę         [mp]ieć
SFX J1   eć        sz        [mp]ieć
SFX J1   eć        0         [mp]ieć
SFX J1   eć        my        [mp]ieć
SFX J1   eć        cie       [mp]ieć
SFX J1   eć        ą         [mp]ieć
SFX J1   ieć       zę        sieć
SFX J1   eć        sz        sieć
SFX J1   eć        0         sieć
SFX J1   eć        my        sieć
SFX J1   eć        cie       sieć
SFX J1   ieć       zą        sieć
SFX J1   eć        ę         leć
SFX J1   eć        isz       leć
SFX J1   eć        i         leć
SFX J1   eć        imy       leć
SFX J1   eć        icie      leć
SFX J1   eć        ą         leć
SFX J1   ć         ję        [ao]rzeć
SFX J1   ć         jesz      [ao]rzeć
SFX J1   ć         je        [ao]rzeć
SFX J1   ć         jemy      [ao]rzeć
SFX J1   ć         jecie     [ao]rzeć
SFX J1   ć         ją        [ao]rzeć
SFX J1   zeć       ę         [^ao]rzeć
SFX J1   ć         sz        [^ao]rzeć
SFX J1   ć         0         [^ao]rzeć
SFX J1   ć         my        [^ao]rzeć
SFX J1   ć         cie       [^ao]rzeć
SFX J1   zeć       ą         [^ao]rzeć
SFX J1   ć         ę         ęzić
SFX J1   ć         sz        ęzić
SFX J1   ć         0         ęzić
SFX J1   ć         my        ęzić
SFX J1   ć         cie       ęzić
SFX J1   ć         ą         ęzić
SFX J1   ć         ję        [bfmnpw]ić
SFX J1   ć         jesz      [bfmnpw]ić
SFX J1   ć         je        [bfmnpw]ić
SFX J1   ć         jemy      [bfmnpw]ić
SFX J1   ć         jecie     [bfmnpw]ić
SFX J1   ć         ją        [bfmnpw]ić
SFX J1   ąść       ęsę       ąść
SFX J1   ąść       ęsiesz    ąść
SFX J1   ąść       ęsie      ąść
SFX J1   ąść       ęsiemy    ąść
SFX J1   ąść       ęsiecie   ąść
SFX J1   ąść       ęsą       ąść
SFX J1   eść       osę       [^j]eść
SFX J1   ść        siesz     [^j]eść
SFX J1   ść        sie       [^j]eść
SFX J1   ść        siemy     [^j]eść
SFX J1   ść        siecie    [^j]eść
SFX J1   eść       osą       [^j]eść
SFX J1   óść       odę       óść
SFX J1   óść       odziesz   óść
SFX J1   óść       odzie     óść
SFX J1   óść       odziemy   óść
SFX J1   óść       odziecie  óść
SFX J1   óść       odą       óść
SFX J1   ć         ję        [uy]ć
SFX J1   ć         jesz      [uy]ć
SFX J1   ć         je        [uy]ć
SFX J1   ć         jemy      [uy]ć
SFX J1   ć         jecie     [uy]ć
SFX J1   ć         ją        [uy]ć
SFX J1   łuć       olę       kłuć
SFX J1   łuć       olesz     kłuć
SFX J1   łuć       ole       kłuć
SFX J1   łuć       olemy     kłuć
SFX J1   łuć       olecie    kłuć
SFX J1   łuć       olą       kłuć
SFX J1   źć        zę        [^e]źć
SFX J1   źć        ziesz     [^e]źć
SFX J1   źć        zie       [^e]źć
SFX J1   źć        ziemy     [^e]źć
SFX J1   źć        ziecie    [^e]źć
SFX J1   źć        zą        [^e]źć
SFX J1   eźć       ozę       ieźć
SFX J1   źć        ziesz     ieźć
SFX J1   źć        zie       ieźć
SFX J1   źć        ziemy     ieźć
SFX J1   źć        ziecie    ieźć
SFX J1   eźć       ozą       ieźć
SFX J1   źć        zę        leźć
SFX J1   źć        ziesz     leźć
SFX J1   źć        zie       leźć
SFX J1   źć        ziemy     leźć
SFX J1   źć        ziecie    leźć
SFX J1   źć        zą        leźć
